Utah statutes.
53A-2-209.   Denial of enrollment -- Appeal.
(1)  Denial of initial or continuing enrollment in a nonresident school may be
appealed to the board of education of the nonresident district.
(2)  The decision of the board shall be upheld in any subsequent proceedings
unless the board's decision is found, by clear and convincing evidence, to be
in violation of applicable law or regulation, or to be arbitrary and
capricious.
